Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB880.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article IV of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subarticle to read:(n) Access Device SecuritySection 494. Report of Theft.--(a) If a recipient discovers that the access device of the recipient has been stolen and used by another person, including through skimming, resulting in financial detriment to the recipient, the recipient shall report the theft and use to the department, through a verified statement in the form and manner prescribed by the department, as soon as practicable after the discovery of the theft and use.(b) The department may investigate a claim of theft and use 123456789101112131415161718 under this section to verify the occurrence of the theft and use and the extent of financial detriment to the recipient.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Skimming" means the theft of access device information during a legitimate transaction by a recipient, through the use of a skimmer device or other illegal card reader attached to a payment terminal or point of sale system, without the knowledge of the recipient.Section 495. Security Measures.--The department shall provide heightened security measures to protect recipients from financial detriment caused by the theft and use of their access devices, including the following:(1) The replacement of access devices containing magnetic strips with access devices containing embedded chip technology that generates a unique code for each transaction.(2) The establishment of monitoring systems for the use of access devices, with transaction alerts through text message or email.(3) The promotion of a mobile application that includes a feature to lock and unlock an access device.(4) The establishment of streamlined procedures to report theft involving an access device and ensure referrals to emergency nutrition support.(5) The establishment of targeted outreach to educate recipients on theft prevention involving access devices.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0880PN0992 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627